Utah statutes.
31A-21-401.   Scope and construction of part.
This part applies to all mass marketed life or accident and health insurance,
notwithstanding Subsection 31A-1-103(3).  This part may not be construed to
limit the application of other provisions of this title to insurers effecting
mass marketed life or accident and health insurance policies on persons in
this state.
